North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 4. Derivative Proceedings.

§ 55A-7-40.
Derivative proceedings.

An action may be brought in a superior court of this State, which shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over actions brought hereunder, in the right of any domestic or foreign corporation by any member or director, provided that, in the case of an action by a member, the plaintiff or plaintiffs shall allege, and it shall appear, that each plaintiff-member was a member at the time of the transaction of which he complains.

The complaint shall allege with particularity the efforts, if any, made by the plaintiff to obtain the action the plaintiff desires from the directors or comparable authority and the reasons for the plaintiff’s failure to obtain the action or for not making the effort. Whether or not a demand for action was made, if the corporation commences an investigation of the charges made in the demand or complaint, the court may stay any proceedings until the investigation is completed.

Upon motion of the corporation, the court may appoint a committee composed of two or more disinterested directors or other disinterested persons, acceptable to the corporation, to determine whether it is in the best interest of the corporation to pursue a particular legal right or remedy. The committee shall report its findings to the court. After considering the report and any other relevant evidence, the court shall determine whether the proceeding should be continued.

Such action shall not be discontinued, dismissed, compromised, or settled without the approval of the court. The court, in its discretion, may direct that notice, by publication or otherwise, shall be given to any directors, members, creditors, and other persons whose interests it determines will be substantially affected by the discontinuance, dismissal, compromise, or settlement. If notice is so directed to be given, the court may determine which one or more of the parties to the action shall bear the expense of giving the same, in such amount as the court shall determine and find to be reasonable in the circumstances, and the amount of the expense shall be awarded as costs of the action.

If the action on behalf of the corporation is successful, in whole or in part, whether by means of a compromise and settlement or by a judgment, the court may award the plaintiff the reasonable expenses of maintaining the action, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, and shall direct the plaintiff to account to the corporation for the remainder of any proceeds of the action.

In any such action, the court, upon final judgment and a finding that the action was brought without reasonable cause, may require the plaintiff or plaintiffs to pay to the defendant or defendants the reasonable expenses, including attorneys’ fees, incurred by them in the defense of the action.

In proceedings hereunder, no member shall be entitled to obtain or have access to any communication within the scope of the corporation’s attorney-client privilege which could not be obtained by or would not be accessible to a party in an action other than on behalf of the corporation.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 34; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Duties of Nonprofit Corporate Directors - Emphasizing Oversight Responsibilities,” see 90 N.C. L. Rev. 1845 (2012).